Utah statutes.
75-7-410.   Modification or termination of trust -- Proceedings for approval
or disapproval.
(1)  In addition to the methods of termination prescribed by Sections 75-7-411
through 75-7-414, a trust terminates to the extent the trust is revoked or
expires pursuant to its terms, no purpose of the trust remains to be achieved,
or the purposes of the trust have become unlawful, contrary to public policy,
or impossible to achieve.
(2)  A proceeding to approve or disapprove a proposed modification or
termination under Sections 75-7-411 through 75-7-416, or trust combination or
division under Section 75-7-417, may be commenced by a trustee or qualified
beneficiary, and a proceeding to approve or disapprove a proposed modification
or termination under Section 75-7-411 may be commenced by the settlor.  The
settlor of a charitable trust may maintain a proceeding to modify the trust
under Section 75-7-413.
